Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF2467.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; 2026 SPECIAL OLYMPICS USA GAMES.new text end new text begin $2,000,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the arts and cultural heritage fund to the commissioner of administration for a grant to the 2026 Special Olympics USA Games to celebrate the arts and cultural heritage of Minnesota during Special Olympics events, including through design and construction of the Special Olympics Cauldron. new text end